Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LICENSING

§157-21 Licensing. It shall be
unlawful for any producer, producer-distributor, or distributor to produce,
sell, process, or distribute milk in a milk shed unless the person is duly
licensed as provided by this chapter. It shall be unlawful for any such person
to sell, buy, process, or distribute milk which the person knows or has reason
to believe has been produced or handled in violation of this chapter. [L 1967,
c 260, §12; HRS §157-21; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next